New York, session 2025-2026, S3562.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general business law is amended by adding a new section 2 398-g to read as follows: 3 § 398-g. Sale of certain three-dimensional printers. 1. Any retailer 4 of a three-dimensional printer sold in this state which is capable of 5 printing a firearm, or any components of a firearm, is required and 6 authorized to request and receive criminal history information concern- 7 ing such purchaser from the division of criminal justice services in 8 accordance with the provisions of section eight hundred forty-five-b of 9 the executive law. Access to and the use of such information shall be 10 governed by the provisions of such section. The division of criminal 11 justice services is authorized to submit fingerprints to the federal 12 bureau of investigation for a national criminal history record check. 13 2. Within fifteen business days after receiving a request for criminal 14 history information pursuant to this section, the commissioner of the 15 division of criminal justice services shall review such criminal history 16 information and determine whether such purchaser has been convicted 17 anywhere of a felony or a serious offense or who is not the subject of 18 an outstanding warrant of arrest issued upon the alleged commission of a 19 felony or serious offense which would disqualify such individual from 20 being licensed to carry or possess a firearm under section 400.00 of the 21 penal law. Such commissioner shall promptly notify the seller of their 22 determination in this regard. No retailer shall sell any three-dimen- 23 sional printer capable of printing a firearm unless the division of EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04120-01-5 S. 3562 2 1 criminal justice services provides written notification of the determi- 2 nation under this subdivision. 3 3. For purposes of this section, "three-dimensional printer" means a 4 computer or computer-driven machine or device capable of producing a 5 three-dimensional object from a digital model. 6 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 7 have become a law.